Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.021, subdivision 1i, is amended to read: Subd. 1i. deleted text begin Definitiondeleted text end new text begin Definitionsnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end As used in this section,new text begin the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given.new text end new text begin (b) "Basic medical care" means care which is medically necessary to maintain the good health of persons confined or incarcerated in correctional facilities or jails. The care includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) emergency care, including but not limited to hospitalization; new text end new text begin (2) ongoing treatment for health conditions a person had prior to being confined or incarcerated and continues to have while confined or incarcerated; new text end new text begin (3) treatment for conditions arising while confined or incarcerated; new text end new text begin (4) treatment for mental illness and substance use disorders; new text end new text begin (5) the provision of required prescriptions, including but not limited to medications the person was taking prior to being confined or incarcerated; new text end new text begin (6) the provision of required medical devices, including but not limited to mobility devices and sleep apnea devices; and new text end new text begin (7) basic dental care. new text end new text begin (c)new text end "Correctional facility" means any facility, including a group home, having a residential component, the primary purpose of which is to serve persons placed in facilities by a court, court services department, parole authority, or other correctional agency having dispositional power over persons charged with, convicted, or adjudicated guilty or delinquent. new text begin (d) "Jail" means a county jail, workhouse, and lockup. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.021, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Basic health care. new text end new text begin (a) Only licensed medical personnel with the appropriate scope of practice shall make decisions relating to the medical care of persons confined or incarcerated in correctional facilities or jails, including but not limited to determining whether a confined or incarcerated person requires medical care. Failure to facilitate or provide basic medical care for a person under the care of a correctional facility or jail in the state poses a substantial risk of serious harm and constitutes deliberate indifference to the medical needs of the person. new text end new text begin (b) A person who is harmed by a violation of this subdivision or if the person is deceased, the surviving heirs, next of kin, or appointed trustee has a cause of action for injury caused by the violation. new text end new text begin (c) A correctional facility or jail that violates this subdivision is subject to a correction order or conditional license and other restrictions provided under this section. In addition to the remedies provided under this section, if a correctional facility or jail has a third violation or more of this subdivision, the commissioner may impose a fine of at least $5,000 but not more than $25,000 for each violation. The fine shall be collected by the commissioner for deposit in the account for the Office of Ombudsperson for the Department of Corrections. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.021, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Intake release of information. All correctional facilities new text begin and jails new text end that confine or incarcerate adults are required at intake to provide each person an authorization form to release information related to that person's health or mental health condition and when that information should be shared. new text begin This release form shall be a standardized form used by all correctional facilities and jails in the state and shall be uniformly titled The Hardel Sherrell Act Release of Medical Information Form. new text end This release form shall allow the individual to select if the individual wants to require the correctional facility to make attempts to contact the designated person to facilitate the sharing of health condition information upon incapacitation or if the individual becomes unable to communicate or direct the sharing of this information, so long as contact information was provided and the incapacitated individual or individual who is unable to communicate or direct the sharing of this information is not subject to a court order prohibiting contact with the designated person.new text begin This release form shall also specify the medical rights of persons confined or incarcerated in correctional facilities and jails. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [241.027] PORTABLE RECORDING SYSTEM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Correctional officers. new text end new text begin All correctional officers and staff employed by correctional facilities or jails shall be equipped with a portable recording system and record all interactions with persons incarcerated in a correctional facility or jail, or while responding to an institution emergency. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Policy. new text end new text begin The policies for the use of a portable recording system in correctional facilities and jails must comply with the requirements in section 626.8473 regarding portable recording system adoption and a written policy. These policies shall address the activation, deactivation, storage, retention, access, and review of recordings captured by portable recording system devices. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Funding. new text end new text begin The Department of Corrections shall provide funding to correctional facilities and jails to cover the costs associated with the acquisition, maintenance, and training related to portable recording systems. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MEDICAL CARE.new text end new text begin $370,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of corrections for a grant to a 501(c)(3) nonprofit community organization that has the mission to prevent neglect or maltreatment of persons who are confined or incarcerated, advocate for proper medical care for confined or incarcerated persons, provide healing circles for communities, and provide connections between confined or incarcerated persons, family, and correctional staff. The organization must use the appropriation to provide training on the Hardel Sherrell Act for staff working in correctional facilities and jails and for persons confined or incarcerated in correctional facilities and jails. new text end